Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Formation, Articles of Organization and Other Filings

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-29-201.
Formation of limited liability company; articles of organization.

One (1) or more persons may act as organizers to form a limited liability company by signing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of organization.

Articles of organization shall state:

The name of the limited liability company, which must comply with W.S.

17-29-108

;

The street address of the limited liability company’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office; and

Reserved.

The articles of organization shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment signed by the registered agent.

Subject to W.S. 17-29-112(c), articles of organization may also contain statements as to matters other than those required by subsection (b) of this section. However, a statement in articles of organization is not effective as a statement of authority.

The following rules apply:

A limited liability company is formed when the articles of organization become effective, unless the articles state a delayed effective date pursuant to W.S. 17-29-205(c);

If the articles state a delayed effective date, a limited liability company is not formed if, before the articles take effect, a statement of cancellation is signed and delivered to the secretary of state for filing and the secretary of state files the articles;

Subject to any delayed effective date and except in a proceeding by this state to dissolve a limited liability company, the filing of the articles of organization by the secretary of state is conclusive proof that the organizer satisfied all conditions to the formation of a limited liability company.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-202.
Amendment or restatement of articles of organization.

Articles of organization may be amended or restated at any time. Articles of organization shall be amended when:

There is a change in the name of the limited liability company;

There is a false or erroneous statement in the articles of organization.

To amend its articles of organization, a limited liability company must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment stating:

The name of the company;

The date of filing of its articles of organization; and

The changes the amendment makes to the articles as most recently amended or restated.

To restate its articles of organization, a limited liability company shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing a restatement, designated as such in its heading, stating:

In the heading or an introductory paragraph, the company’s present name and the date of the filing of the company’s initial articles of organization; and

The changes the restatement makes to the articles as most recently amended or restated.

Subject to W.S. 17-29-112(c) and 17-29-205(c), an amendment to or restatement of articles of organization is effective when delivered for filing with the secretary of state.

If a member of a member-managed limited liability company, or a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, knows that any information in filed articles of organization was inaccurate when the articles were filed or has become inaccurate owing to changed circumstances, the member or manager shall promptly:

Cause the articles to be amended; or

If appropriate, deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction under W.S.

17-28-102

or a statement of correction under W.S.

17-29-206

.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-203.
Signing of records to be delivered for filing to secretary of state.

A record delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this chapter shall be signed as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (ii) through (iv) of this subsection, a record signed on behalf of a limited liability company shall be signed by a person authorized by the company;

A limited liability company’s initial articles of organization shall be signed by at least one (1) person acting as an organizer;

Reserved;

A record filed on behalf of a dissolved limited liability company that has no members shall be signed by the person winding up the company’s activities under W.S. 17-29-702(c) or a person appointed under W.S. 17-29-702(d) to wind up those activities;

A statement of cancellation under W.S. 17-29-201(e)(ii) shall be signed by each organizer that signed the initial articles of organization, but a personal representative of a deceased or incompetent organizer may sign in the place of the decedent or incompetent;

A statement of denial by a person under W.S.

17-29-303

shall be signed by that person; and

Any other record shall be signed by the person on whose behalf the record is delivered to the secretary of state.

Any record filed under this chapter may be signed by an agent.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(v), substituted “W.S. 17-29-201(e)(ii)” for “W.S. 17-29-201(d)(ii).”

§ 17-29-204.
Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the appropriate court to order:

The person to sign the record;

The person to deliver the record to the secretary of state for filing; or

The secretary of state to file the record unsigned.

If a petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the company a party to the action.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-205.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state; effective time and date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter shall be captioned to describe the record’s purpose, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the filing fees required by this act or other law and any past due fees, taxes or penalties have been paid, unless the secretary of state determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the record and:

For a statement of denial under W.S.

17-29-303

, send a copy of the filed statement and a receipt for the fees to the person on whose behalf the statement was delivered for filing and to the limited liability company; and

For all other records, send a copy of the filed record and a receipt for the fees to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of the requisite fee, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of a requested record.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

17-28-103

and

17-29-206

, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this article shall be effective as provided in W.S.

17-16-123

.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record under subsection (a) of this section, the secretary of state shall return it to the limited liability company or its representative within fifteen (15) days after the record was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), inserted “required by this act or other law and any past due fees, taxes or penalties” in the second sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (d).

§ 17-29-206.
Correcting filed record.

A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction to correct a record previously delivered by the company to the secretary of state and filed by the secretary of state, if at the time of filing the record contained inaccurate information or was defectively signed.

A statement of correction under subsection (a) of this section may not state a delayed effective date and shall:

Describe the record to be corrected, including its filing date, or attach a copy of the record as filed;

Specify the inaccurate information and the reason it is inaccurate or the manner in which the signing was defective; and

Correct the defective signature or inaccurate information.

When filed by the secretary of state, a statement of correction under subsection (a) of this section is effective retroactively as of the effective date of the record the statement corrects, but the statement is effective when filed:

For the purposes of W.S. 17-29-103(d); and

As to persons that previously relied on the uncorrected record and would be adversely affected by the retroactive effect.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-207.
Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and filed by the secretary of state contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a member of a member-managed limited liability company or the manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, if:

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the company; and

The member or manager had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the member or manager reasonably could have:

Effected an amendment under W.S.

17-29-202

;

Filed a petition under W.S.

17-29-204

; or

Delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction under W.S.

17-28-102

or a statement of correction under W.S.

17-29-206

.

To the extent that the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of responsibility for maintaining the accuracy of information contained in records delivered on behalf of the company to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and imposes that responsibility on one (1) or more other members, the liability stated in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section applies to those other members and not to the member that the operating agreement relieves of the responsibility.

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter affirms under penalty of perjury that the information stated in the record is accurate.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-208.
Certificate of existence or authorization.

The secretary of state, upon request and payment of the requisite fee, shall furnish to any person a certificate of existence for a limited liability company if the records filed in the office of the secretary of state show that the company has been formed under W.S.

17-29-201

and the secretary of state has not filed articles of dissolution pertaining to the company. A certificate of existence shall state:

The company’s name;

That the company was duly formed under the laws of this state and the date of formation;

Whether all fees, taxes and penalties due under this chapter or other law to the secretary of state have been paid;

Whether the company’s most recent annual report required by W.S.

17-29-209

has been filed by the secretary of state;

Whether the secretary of state has administratively dissolved the company;

Whether the company has delivered to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution;

Reserved; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state which are specified by the person requesting the certificate.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or certificate of authorization issued by the secretary of state is conclusive evidence that the limited liability company is in existence.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-209.
Annual report for secretary of state.

Every limited liability company organized under the laws of this state and every foreign limited liability company which obtains a certificate of authority to transact and carry on business within this state shall file with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the month of organization of every year a certification, under the penalty of perjury, by its treasurer or other fiscal agent setting forth its capital, property and assets located and employed in the state of Wyoming. The statement shall give the address of its principal office. On or before the first day of the month of organization of every year the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall pay to the secretary of state in addition to all other statutory taxes and fees a license fee based upon the sum of its capital, property and assets reported, of sixty dollars ($60.00) or two-tenths of one mill on the dollar ($.0002), whichever is greater.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be modified as follows:

Any limited liability company or foreign limited liability company engaged in the public calling of carrying goods, passengers or information interstate is not required to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section except to the extent of capital, property and assets used in intrastate business in this state;

The value of all mines and mining claims from which gold, silver and other precious metals, soda, saline, coal, mineral oil or other valuable deposit, is or shall be produced is deemed equivalent to the assessed value of the gross product thereof, for the previous year;

The assessed value of any property shall be its actual value.

Financial information in the annual report shall be current as of the end of the limited liability company’s or foreign limited liability company’s fiscal year immediately preceding the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the company. All other information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the company.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign limited liability company in writing and return the report to it for correction.

Every limited liability company or foreign limited liability company registered or authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming shall preserve for three (3) years at its principal place of business, suitable records and books as may be necessary to determine the amount of fee for which it is liable under this section. All records and books shall be available for examination by the secretary of state or his designee during regular business hours except as arranged by mutual consent.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2016 ch. 42, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2016 amendment

, substituted “a certificate of authority” for “the right” in (a).

Laws 2016, ch. 42 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "sixty dollars ($60.00)" for "fifty dollars ($50.00)" in the last sentence of (a).

§ 17-29-210.
Fees; annual fee.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect fees from limited liability companies and foreign limited liability companies for:

Filing the original articles of organization, one hundred dollars ($100.00);

For amending the articles of organization, a filing fee of sixty dollars ($60.00);

An annual fee accompanying the report required in W.S.

17-29-209

, due and payable on or before the date of the filing under W.S.

17-29-209

;

Filing, service and copying fees for those services provided by his office for which a fee is not otherwise established. A fee shall not exceed the cost of providing the service;

Issuing a certificate of authority for a foreign limited liability company, a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).

Except for articles of organization, any document to be filed with the secretary of state shall be signed by the member, members, manager, managers or other authorized individual as set forth in the operating agreement. A person signing a document, including the articles of organization, he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any foreign limited liability company transacting business in this state without obtaining a certificate of authority as required by W.S.

17-16-1501

and

17-29-114

is subject to the penalties provided by W.S. 17-16-1502(d).

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2016 ch. 42, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2016 amendment,

substituted “obtaining a certificate of authority as required by W.S.

17-16-1501

and

17-29-114

” for “qualifying” in (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 42 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or issuing a certificate of authority for a foreign limited liability company" following "organization" in (a)(i); substituted "sixty dollars ($60.00)" for "fifty dollars ($50.00)" in (a)(ii); and added (a)(v).

§ 17-29-211.
Series of members, managers, transferable interests or assets.

An operating agreement may establish or provide for the establishment of one (1) or more designated series of members, managers, transferable interests or assets. This section shall govern any matter with respect to a series to the extent not otherwise provided in the operating agreement.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if an operating agreement establishes or provides for the establishment of a particular series:

The debts, obligations or other liabilities of the particular series, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, shall be enforceable against the assets of the series only and not against:

The assets of the limited liability company generally or any other series thereof;

Any member of the limited liability company.

The debts, obligations or other liabilities of the limited liability company generally or any other series thereof, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, shall not be enforceable against the assets of the particular series.

The limitations on liabilities in subsection (b) of this section shall only apply if:

The records for the particular series that account for the assets of the series are separately maintained from the records that account for the assets of the limited liability company or any other series thereof. Records that reasonably identify the assets of a particular series, including by specific listing, category, type, quantity, computational or allocational formula or procedure such as a percentage or share of assets or by any other method where the identity of the assets is objectively determinable, shall be deemed to account for the assets of the particular series separately from the assets of the limited liability company or any other series thereof;

The operating agreement specifically provides for the limitations on liabilities; and

Notice of the limitations on liabilities of the particular series is included in the articles of organization. Notice under this paragraph shall be sufficient whether or not the limited liability company has established or referenced any particular series in the notice.

Nothing in this section, an operating agreement or articles of organization shall restrict:

A series or limited liability company on behalf of a series from agreeing in the operating agreement or otherwise that any or all of the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the limited liability company generally or any other series thereof shall be enforceable against the assets of the series;

A limited liability company from agreeing in the operating agreement or otherwise that any or all of the debts, obligations or other liabilities of a series shall be enforceable against the assets of the limited liability company generally; or

Notwithstanding W.S. 17-29-304(a), a member or manager from agreeing in the operating agreement or otherwise to be personally liable for any or all of the debts, obligations or other liabilities of a series.

A series established under this section shall have the power and capacity to, in its own name, contract, hold title to assets including real, personal and intangible property, grant liens and security interests and sue and be sued. A series may:

Have separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property or obligations of the limited liability company or profits and losses associated with specified property or obligations;

Carry on any lawful purpose regardless of whether for profit, except for the purpose of acting as a financial institution or acting as an insurer as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xvi);

Hold assets directly or indirectly, including in the name of the series or the name of the limited liability company.

An operating agreement that establishes or provides for the establishment of a series may:

Provide for classes or groups of members or managers of the series having the relative rights, powers and duties specified in the operating agreement;

Provide for and specify the future creation of additional classes or groups of members or managers of the series having the relative rights, powers and duties as may be established, including rights, powers and duties senior to existing classes and groups of members or managers of the series;

Provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the operating agreement, without the vote or approval of any member or manager or class or group of members or managers of the series;

Provide that any member or class or group of members of a series shall have no voting rights;

Grant to all or certain identified members or managers or class or group of members or managers of the series the right to vote on any matter separately or with all or any class or group of members or managers of the series. Voting by members or managers may be on a per capita, number, financial interest, class, group or other basis.

The management of a series shall be vested as follows:

In the members of the series pursuant to W.S. 17-29-407(b). A member shall cease to be a member of a series upon the divestment of all of the member’s transferable interests of the series. The fact that a person ceases to be a member of a particular series shall not by itself cause the person to cease to be a member of the limited liability company or any other series thereof or cause the termination of the series, regardless of whether the person was the last remaining member of the series; or

If the operating agreement provides for the management of the series in whole or in part by a manager, the management shall be vested in one (1) or more managers who shall be chosen as provided in the operating agreement and who shall hold the offices and have the responsibilities as specified in the agreement. A manager shall cease to be a manager of a series as provided in an operating agreement and subject to W.S. 17-29-407(c)(v). The fact that a person ceases to be a manager of a particular series shall not by itself cause the person to cease to be a manager of the limited liability company or any other series thereof.

Notwithstanding W.S.

17-29-404

and subject to subsections (j) and (m) of this section, if a member of a series becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the series with respect to the distribution. An operating agreement may provide for the establishment of a record date for allocations and distributions associated with a series.

Notwithstanding W.S. 17-29-405(a), a limited liability company may make a distribution with respect to a series that has been established under this section unless the total assets of the series after the distribution would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the series were to be dissolved, wound up and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon winding up and termination of members whose preferential rights are superior to those of the persons receiving the distribution. A member that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution was made in violation of this subsection is personally liable to the series for the amount of the distribution. This subsection shall not affect any obligation or liability of a member under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution, except that any action under this subsection shall be subject to W.S. 17-29-406(e). For purposes of this subsection, “distribution” does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

Subject to W.S.

17-29-702

, a series established under this section may be terminated and its affairs wound up without causing the dissolution of the limited liability company. The termination of the series shall not affect the limitations on liabilities of the series as provided in subsection (b) of this section. A series is terminated and its affairs shall be wound up upon the occurrence of any of the following:

The dissolution of the limited liability company under W.S.

17-29-702

;

The time or happening of events specified in the operating agreement;

The vote or consent of members of the series who own more than two–thirds (2/3) of the interests in the profits of the series; or

On application by a member or manager of the series, the entry of a court order terminating the series on the grounds that it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the purposes of the series in conformity with the operating agreement.

A person winding up the affairs of a series may, in the name of the limited liability company and for and on behalf of the limited liability company and the series, take all actions with respect to the series as authorized by W.S.

17-29-702

. The person shall provide for the claims and obligations of the series and distribute the assets of the series as provided in W.S.

17-29-708

. Actions taken in accordance with this subsection shall not affect the liability of members and shall not impose liability on a liquidating trustee appointed in accordance with this subsection. Notwithstanding W.S.

17-29-702

, the following persons may wind up the affairs of a series:

A manager of the series who has not wrongfully terminated the series;

If the series has no manager who qualifies under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the members of the series or a person approved by the members;

The members who own more than fifty (50%) percent of the interests in the profits of the series;

On application of a member or manager of the series or any personal representative or assignee of the member or manager, and upon cause shown, a court or a liquidating trustee appointed by the court.

A foreign limited liability company doing business in this state and governed by an operating agreement that establishes or provides for the establishment of one (1) or more designated series of members, managers, transferable interests or assets shall state the following on its certificate of authority:

That the operating agreement of the foreign limited liability company establishes or provides for the establishment of series having separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property or obligations of the foreign limited liability company or profits and losses associated with specified property or obligations;

If any of the debts, obligations or other liabilities of any particular series, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, shall be enforceable against the assets of the particular series only and not against the assets of the foreign limited liability company generally or any other series thereof;

If any of the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the foreign limited liability company generally or any other series thereof, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, shall be enforceable against the assets of the particular series.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect fees from limited liability companies and foreign limited liability companies establishing one (1) or more series in the amount of ten dollars ($10.00) per series designated or established under this section.

History.

2018 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (o).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 46, § 2, provides: “The secretary of state shall promulgate
reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes
of this act.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 46, § 3(b), Section 2 of this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 46, § 2, provides: “The secretary of state shall promulgate
reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes
of this act.”